Utah statutes.
16-6a-301.   Purposes.
(1)  Every nonprofit corporation incorporated under this chapter that in its
articles of incorporation has a statement meeting the requirements of
Subsection 16-6a-202(3)(a) may engage in any lawful activity except for
express limitations set forth in the articles of incorporation.
(2) (a)  A nonprofit corporation engaging in an activity that is subject to
regulation under another statute of this state may incorporate under this
chapter only if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of, the other
statute.
(b)  Without limiting Subsection (2)(a) and subject to Subsection (2)(c), an
organization may not be organized under this chapter if the organization is
subject to the:
(i)  insurance laws of this state; or
(ii)  laws governing depository institutions as defined in Section 7-1-103.
(c)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(b), the following may be organized under
this chapter:
(i)  a health insurance purchasing association as defined in Section
31A-34-103; and
(ii)  a health insurance purchasing alliance licensed under Title 31A, Chapter
34, Voluntary Health Insurance Purchasing Alliance Act.
